Washington statutes.
RCW 18.330.140

Application of consumer protection act.

The legislature finds that the operation of an agency in violation of this chapter is a matter vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Such a violation is an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 2011 c 357 s 15.]